lexc-files/emotional_roots.txt
!====================
LEXICON EmotionalRoot
!====================

alangghu(EMO):alangghu    EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! missing something; at a loss
anumi(EMO):anumi          EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! favoring; concerned for
efsi(EMO):efsi            EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! sick and tired of someone or something; rejecting; disliking
esliga(EMO):esliga        EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! awkward; out of place
igalnga(EMO):igalnga      EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! utilizing an unexpected opportunity or inviting situation
igamsiqa(EMO):igamsiqa    EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! thankful; grateful
igha(EMO):igha            EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! disgusted; feeling aversion
igherngu(EMO):igherngu    EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! uncomfortable
iyamsiqa(EMO):iyamsiqa    EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! thankful; grateful
kayngu(EMO):kayngu        EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! embarrassed; ashamed
kelli(EMO):kelli          EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! lustful; desiring
megnu(EMO):megnu          EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! caring deeply; valuing; holding as important
mighu(EMO):mighu          EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! unappetizing
nanggha(EMO):nanggha      EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! interesting; exciting
paqna(EMO):paqna          EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! apprehensive; wary of danger; worried; concerned
peghtu(EMO):peghtu        EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! overwhelmed
qugina(EMO):qugina        EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! ticklish
saghiigha(EMO):saghiigha  EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! astonished; amazed
sikna(EMO):sikna          EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! selfish; possessive; valuing; conserving
tengghu(EMO):tengghu      EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! enthusiastic
ugumi(EMO):ugumi          EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! hateful; angry; frustrated; finding something cute
vighvi(EMO):vighvi        EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! annoyed at ones hyperactivity'
yimi(EMO):yimi            EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! shy; intimidated; cowering
yumi(EMO):yumi            EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! shy; intimidated; cowering
(EMO):
kusge(EMO):kusge          EmotionalRootPostbaseII;  ! squeamish; finicky
(EMO):
egtug(EMO):egtug          EmotionalRootPostbaseIII; ! anxious
nellug(EMO):nellug        EmotionalRootPostbaseIII; ! uncomortable; claustrophobic; ill at ease
qesug(EMO):qesug          EmotionalRootPostbaseIII; ! happy; excited; enjoying
quginag(EMO):quginag      EmotionalRootPostbaseIII; ! terrified especially of the supernatural; spooked; scared
taayug(EMO):taayug        EmotionalRootPostbaseIII; ! hurried; pressed for time
teghig(EMO):teghig        EmotionalRootPostbaseIII; ! having fun; enjoying
(EMO):
aghliigh(EMO):aghliigh    EmotionalRootPostbaseIV;  ! overwhelmed
efqugh(EMO):efqugh        EmotionalRootPostbaseIV;  ! pleased; satisfied
imugh(EMO):imugh          EmotionalRootPostbaseIV;  ! on the verge of crying; tearful
iisqugh(EMO):iisqugh      EmotionalRootPostbaseIV;  ! intimidated; hesitant to look another in the eye; considerate of the feelings
pellagh(EMO):pellagh      EmotionalRootPostbaseIV;  ! lonely; bored
pesugh(EMO):pesugh        EmotionalRootPostbaseIV;  ! stuffy; suffocating
qaazugh(EMO):qaazugh      EmotionalRootPostbaseIV;  ! out of place or out of sorts; odd
qiliigh(EMO):qiliigh      EmotionalRootPostbaseIV;  ! coveting; desiring
takagh(EMO):takagh        EmotionalRootPostbaseIV;  ! inhibited; shy; respectful
tallugh(EMO):tallugh      EmotionalRootPostbaseIV;  ! shy; intimidated; cowed; timid
yakugh(EMO):yakugh        EmotionalRootPostbaseIV;  ! in danger; fearful of danger"
(EMO):
eflegh(EMO):eflegh        EmotionalRootPostbaseVII; ! uncomfortable from wetness
elpeg(EMO):elpeg          EmotionalRootPostbaseVII; ! sensing something; being aware of something; edgy
nanglleg(EMO):nanglleg    EmotionalRootPostbaseVII; ! compassionate; feeling pity

!----------------------------------------------------
! postbases associated with emotional roots may also
! be used with verb roots associated with emotion
! [Badten p.629, p.631, p.649]
!----------------------------------------------------
aklu(V):aklu              EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! to be in need
alguma(V):alguma          EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! to be envious
nallu(V):nallu            EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! to not know
qaasni(V):qaasni          EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! to sting
kelnga(V):kelnga          EmotionalRootPostbaseI;   ! to be wary
alinge(V):alinge          EmotionalRootPostbaseII;  ! to be afraid
kaleve(V):kaleve          EmotionalRootPostbaseII;  ! to sink into snow, mud, etc.
kakave(V):kakave          EmotionalRootPostbaseII;  ! to panic
kasug(V):kasug            EmotionalRootPostbaseIII; ! to hit or be hit
igatagh(V):igatagh        EmotionalRootPostbaseIV;  ! to be hungry
iyatagh(V):iyatagh        EmotionalRootPostbaseIV;  ! to be hungry
nenglagh(V):nenglagh      EmotionalRootPostbaseIV;  ! to laugh
pallugte(V):pallug%{t%}e  EmotionalRootPostbaseV;   ! to thrash around in water


!=============================
LEXICON EmotionalRootPostbaseI
!=============================

^~–ketagh(EMO→N):^keta%{g%}h  NounPostbaseIII; ! one who tends to often feel R
^@~fnagh(EMO→N):^na%{g%}h     NounPostbaseIII; ! something that causes one to feel R
^+tagh(EMO→N):^ta%{g%}h       NounPostbaseIII; ! one who tends to often feel R

^~–ke(EMO→V):^ke              VerbPostbaseII;  ! to feel R toward object
^@~yuke(EMO→V):^yuke          VerbPostbaseII;  ! to feel R toward object
^@~fyug(EMO→V):^yug           VerbPostbaseIII; ! to feel R, to be R
^~–ketagh(EMO→V):^ketagh      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to often feel R
^@~fnagh(EMO→V):^nagh         VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to cause one to feel R
^tagh(EMO→V):^tagh            VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to often feel R
^@~yagute(EMO→V):^yagu%{t%}e  VerbPostbaseV;   ! to come to feel R toward object

!==============================
LEXICON EmotionalRootPostbaseII
!==============================

^~–ketagh(EMO→N):^%{.f.%}keta%{g%}h  NounPostbaseIII; ! one who tends to often feel R
^@~fnagh(EMO→N):^%{.f.%}na%{g%}h     NounPostbaseIII; ! something that causes one to feel R
^+tagh(EMO→N):^ta%{g%}h              NounPostbaseIII; ! one who tends to often feel R

^~–ke(EMO→V):^%{.f.%}ke              VerbPostbaseII;  ! to feel R toward object
^@~yuke(EMO→V):^%{.f.%}yuke          VerbPostbaseII;  ! to feel R toward object
^@~fyug(EMO→V):^%{.f.%}yug           VerbPostbaseIII; ! to feel R, to be R
^~–ketagh(EMO→V):^%{.f.%}ketagh      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to often feel R
^@~fnagh(EMO→V):^%{.f.%}nagh         VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to cause one to feel R
^+tagh(EMO→V):^tagh                  VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to often feel R
^@~yagute(EMO→V):^%{.f.%}yagu%{t%}e  VerbPostbaseV;   ! to come to feel R toward object

!===============================
LEXICON EmotionalRootPostbaseIII
!===============================

^~–ketagh(EMO→N):^%{.m.%}keta%{g%}h  NounPostbaseIII; ! one who tends to often feel R
^@~fnagh(EMO→N):^na%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! something that causes one to feel R
^+tagh(EMO→N):^ta%{g%}h              NounPostbaseIII; ! one who tends to often feel R

^~–ke(EMO→V):^%{.m.%}ke              VerbPostbaseII;  ! to feel R toward object
^@~yuke(EMO→V):^yuke                 VerbPostbaseII;  ! to feel R toward object
^@~fyug(EMO→V):^yug                  VerbPostbaseIII; ! to feel R, to be R
^~–ketagh(EMO→V):^%{.m.%}ketagh      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to often feel R
^@~fnagh(EMO→V):^nagh                VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to cause one to feel R
^+tagh(EMO→V):^tagh                  VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to often feel R
^@~yagute(EMO→V):^yagu%{t%}e         VerbPostbaseV;   ! to come to feel R toward object

!==============================
LEXICON EmotionalRootPostbaseIV
!==============================

^~–ketagh(EMO→N):^%{.m.%}keta%{g%}h  NounPostbaseIII; ! one who tends to often feel R
^@~fnagh(EMO→N):^na%{g%}h            NounPostbaseIII; ! something that causes one to feel R
^+tagh(EMO→N):^ta%{g%}h              NounPostbaseIII; ! one who tends to often feel R

^~–ke(EMO→V):^%{.m.%}ke              VerbPostbaseII;  ! to feel R toward object
^@~yuke(EMO→V):^%{.at.%}yuke         VerbPostbaseII;  ! to feel R toward object
^@~fyug(EMO→V):^yug                  VerbPostbaseIII; ! to feel R, to be R
^~–ketagh(EMO→V):^%{.m.%}ketagh      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to often feel R
^@~fnagh(EMO→V):^nagh                VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to cause one to feel R
^+tagh(EMO→V):^tagh                  VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to often feel R
^@~yagute(EMO→V):^yagu%{t%}e         VerbPostbaseV;   ! to come to feel R toward object

!=============================
LEXICON EmotionalRootPostbaseV
!=============================

^~–ketagh(EMO→N):^%{.f.%}keta%{g%}h   NounPostbaseIII; ! one who tends to often feel R
^@~fnagh(EMO→N):^%{.at.%}na%{g%}h     NounPostbaseIII; ! something that causes one to feel R
^+tagh(EMO→N):^ta%{g%}h               NounPostbaseIII; ! one who tends to often feel R

^~–ke(EMO→V):^%{.f.%}ke               VerbPostbaseII;  ! to feel R toward object
^@~yuke(EMO→V):^%{.at.%}yuke          VerbPostbaseII;  ! to feel R toward object
^@~fyug(EMO→V):^%{.at.%}yug           VerbPostbaseIII; ! to feel R, to be R
^~–ketagh(EMO→V):^%{.f.%}ketagh       VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to often feel R
^@~fnagh(EMO→V):^%{.at.%}nagh         VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to cause one to feel R
^+tagh(EMO→V):^tagh                   VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to often feel R
^@~yagute(EMO→V):^%{.at.%}yagu%{t%}e  VerbPostbaseV;   ! to come to feel R toward object

!==============================
LEXICON EmotionalRootPostbaseVI
!==============================

^~–ketagh(EMO→N):^%{.f.%}keta%{g%}h   NounPostbaseIII; ! one who tends to often feel R
^@~fnagh(EMO→N):^%{.at.%}na%{g%}h     NounPostbaseIII; ! something that causes one to feel R
^+tagh(EMO→N):^ta%{g%}h               NounPostbaseIII; ! one who tends to often feel R

^~–ke(EMO→V):^%{.f.%}ke               VerbPostbaseII;  ! to feel R toward object
^@~yuke(EMO→V):^%{.at.%}yuke          VerbPostbaseII;  ! to feel R toward object
^@~fyug(EMO→V):^%{.at.%}yug           VerbPostbaseIII; ! to feel R, to be R
^~–ketagh(EMO→V):^%{.f.%}ketagh       VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to often feel R
^@~fnagh(EMO→V):^%{.at.%}nagh         VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to cause one to feel R
^+tagh(EMO→V):^tagh                   VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to often feel R
^@~yagute(EMO→V):^%{.at.%}yagu%{t%}e  VerbPostbaseV;   ! to come to feel R toward object

!===============================
LEXICON EmotionalRootPostbaseVII
!===============================

^~–ketagh(EMO→N):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}keta%{g%}h  NounPostbaseIII; ! one who tends to often feel R
^@~fnagh(EMO→N):^na%{g%}h                    NounPostbaseIII; ! something that causes one to feel R
^+tagh(EMO→N):^ta%{g%}h                      NounPostbaseIII; ! one who tends to often feel R
^
^~–ke(EMO→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}ke              VerbPostbaseII;  ! to feel R toward object
^@~yuke(EMO→V):^%{.sf.%}yuke                 VerbPostbaseII;  ! to feel R toward object
^@~fyug(EMO→V):^yug                          VerbPostbaseIII; ! to feel R, to be R
^~–ketagh(EMO→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}ketagh      VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to often feel R
^@~fnagh(EMO→V):^nagh                        VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to cause one to feel R
^+tagh(EMO→V):^tagh                          VerbPostbaseIV;  ! to tend to often feel R
^@~yagute(EMO→V):^%{.sf.%}%{.m.%}yagu%{t%}e  VerbPostbaseV;   ! to come to feel R toward object
